Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6577XC (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Cash transactions and 1 payments ââ rounding. 2 1. The following shall apply to a person that sells a good 3 or service in a cash transaction in the state, enters into 4 a transaction that results in a payment or transfer of cash 5 between the parties to the transaction, or pays cash wages to 6 an employee as compensation in the state: 7 a. Except as provided in paragraph âcâ , if the total 8 transaction amount, including any taxes, ends with one, two, 9 six, or seven as the final digit of the number of cents for the 10 transaction, the person may round down the number of cents to 11 the nearest number of cents divisible by five. 12 b. If the total transaction amount, including any taxes, 13 ends with three, four, eight, or nine as the final digit of the 14 number of cents for the transaction, the person may round up 15 the number of cents to the nearest number of cents divisible 16 by five. 17 c. If the total transaction amount, including any taxes, 18 totals one or two cents, the person shall round up the 19 transaction amount to five cents. 20 2. This section shall not apply to a transaction or payment 21 made with a demand or negotiable instrument, electronic fund 22 transfer, check, gift card, money order, credit card, or other 23 similar instrument or method. 24